South Dakota, session 2026, HB1064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 39-5:
Except as prohibited by federal law and subject to section 2 of this Act, and
notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a producer may sell meat or meat
food products from cattle, sheep, swine, or goats, which were raised by the producer and
slaughtered at a custom exempt plant, if:
(1) The meat or meat food product is produced from an animal that was raised by the
producer for at least ninety days, slaughtered, and processed in this state;
(2) The meat or meat food product is sold personally by the seller, directly to an end
consumer in this state, at:
(a) The seller's primary residence;
(b) A farmer's market;
(c) A roadside stand; or
(d) Another temporary sale venue; and
(3) A label is affixed to the meat or meat food product packaging at the time of sale
stating that:
(a) The meat or meat food product has not been inspected and is not regulated;
and
(b) The consumer agrees not to sell, donate, or commercially redistribute the
meat or meat food product.
Section 2. Section 1 of this Act is effective on the date that the attorney general certifies to
code counsel that the sale of any meat or meat food product, in accordance with section 1 of
this Act, is legalized under federal law. Legalization under federal law consists of either the
passage of a federal law that allows direct‑to‑consumer sales of uninspected meat or meat

26.279.13 2 1064
food products or the issuance of a final decision, by a federal court with jurisdiction over this
state, which declares that the federal prohibition on direct‑to‑consumer sales is
unconstitutional or otherwise invalid.
HB1064 ENROLLED

26.279.13 3 1064
An Act to provide for the sale of producer-raised meat and meat food products directly to
consumers pending legalization under federal law.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1064
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1064 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1064 ENROLLED